Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5263.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4. (1) The ombudsman may commence an investigation upon his or her the ombudsman's own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint from a complainant concerning an administrative act, medical treatment of a resident veteran, or a condition existing at a facility that poses a significant health or safety issue for which there is no effective administrative remedy or is alleged to be contrary to law or departmental policy. (2) The ombudsman may immediately commence an independent investigation of a report of abuse upon receipt of the report of abuse. (3) The ombudsman may interview any of the following individuals whom the ombudsman considers necessary in an investigation under this section: (a) An individual employed by or retained under contract by the department. (b) An individual employed by or retained under contract by a private contractor that operates a facility that houses resident veterans. (c) An individual who has personal knowledge of the events described in a report of abuse. (4) (2) Subject to approval of the council, the ombudsman shall establish procedures for receiving and processing complaints under subsection (1) and reports of abuse under subsection (2), conducting investigations, holding hearings, and reporting the findings resulting from the investigations. (5) If the department or an employee of a facility receives a report of abuse, the department or employee of a facility shall forward a written copy of that report of abuse to the ombudsman. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5267 (request no. H04348'25). (b) House Bill No. 5268 (request no. H04350'25). (c) House Bill No. 5269 (request no. H04351'25). (d) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H04352'25).